Tennessee, session 114, SB0446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR)
shall conduct a study and prepare a report on recommendations regarding overall road
safety, including the safety of all users of public highways, roads, and streets in this
state, such as teen driving, older drivers, pedestrian safety, bicycle safety, motorcycle
safety, and mass transit safety.
(b) The study and report must:
(1) Identify different groups of road users, including motor vehicle drivers,
bicyclists, pedestrians, transit vehicle users, and other users of public roads,
streets, and highways, and the safety problems unique to each group;
(2) Provide recommendations to promote safe behaviors for different
groups of road users; and
(3) Identify new designs and technologies to advance the goal of
increasing road safety.
(c) All appropriate state departments and agencies shall provide assistance to
TACIR in connection with the study required by subsection (a).
(d) On or before January 15, 2026, TACIR shall report its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the chair of the committee of
SB0446
002378
- 1 -

the house of representatives having jurisdiction over transportation matters, the chair of
the transportation and safety committee of the senate, and the legislative librarian.
(e) It is the legislative intent that this study must be conducted from TACIR's
existing resources.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002378